Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1305
Federal court judgment; transcript to other county; effect.

A transcript of any judgment or decree rendered in a circuit or district court of the United States within the State of Nebraska, may be filed in the office of the clerk of the district court in any county in this state. Such transcript, when so filed and entered on the judgment index, shall be a lien on the property of the debtor in any county in which such transcript is so filed, in the same manner and under the same conditions only as if such judgment or decree had been rendered by the district court of such county. Such transcript shall at no time have a greater validity or effect than the original judgment. The lands and tenements of the debtor within the county where the judgment is entered shall be bound for the satisfaction thereof from the day on which such judgment is rendered without the filing of a transcript. Orders reviving dormant judgments shall become liens upon the lands and tenements of the judgment debtor only when such order is entered on the judgment index in the same manner as an original judgment.

Laws 1889, c. 30, § 1, p. 377;

R.S.1913, § 7998;

C.S.1922, § 8939;

Laws 1929, c. 83, § 1, p. 332;

C.S.1929, § 20-1305;

R.S.1943, § 25-1305;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 20.

On appeal under this section, parties retain the same status in district court as they had in tribunal below. School Dist. of Wilber v. Pracheil, 180 Neb. 121, 141 N.W.2d 768 (1966).

Federal court judgment is lien on real estate only in county where rendered, unless transcript is filed in other counties. Rathbone Co. v. Kimball, 117 Neb. 229, 220 N.W. 244 (1928).